Massachusetts, session 194th, S3043.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 3 of chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other
general or special law to the contrary, and in order to promote the public good, the state board of
retirement shall credit Omar H. Ricketts of the city of Taunton police department with creditable
service for the period of February 14, 1994 to March 30, 2008 in which time he was a police
officer for the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority for the purpose of determining his
superannuation retirement allowance pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (a) of subdivision
(2) of section 5 of chapter 32 of the General Laws. Eligibility for this creditable service shall be
conditioned upon payment by Omar H. Ricketts of the city of Taunton police department into the
state employees’ retirement system of an amount equal to the amount that would have been
deducted under said chapter 32 if he had received regular compensation during this period at an
annual rate equal to the annual rate of regular compensation that he was receiving immediately
of 2

before this period together with regular interest thereon. Such repayment shall be made in 1 sum
or installments as the state retirement board shall prescribe.
SECTION 2. Upon Omar H. Ricketts’ retirement pursuant to sections 5, 6 or 7 of chapter
32, or pursuant to any special act, or in the event of Omar H. Ricketts’ death prior to his
retirement, the state board of retirement upon request shall transfer the funds it received from
Omar H. Ricketts pursuant to this Act, together with accrued interest, to the Massachusetts
Contributory Retirement System of which he is a member at the time of his retirement or death,
and the state board of retirement shall accept liability pursuant to paragraph (c) of subdivision (8)
of section 3 of chapter 32 for fourteen (14) years and one (1) month of creditable service
rendered during the period of February 14, 1994 to March 30, 2008.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding the transfer required in Section 2, the state board of
retirement shall not bear any liability pursuant to paragraph (c) of subdivision (8) of section 3 of
chapter 32 for the aforementioned transfer and creditable service if Omar H. Ricketts retires for
accidental disability, or his surviving spouse or dependents are awarded accidental death or line
of duty death benefits pursuant to sections 9 or 100 of chapter 32, respectively.
SECTION 4. This act shall be effective upon its passage.
of 2